Tennessee, session 114, HB2342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-202(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The report may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2342
012262
- 1 -